Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 125.
SECTION 2. A person appointed as a court visitor is immune from any liability for acts,
omissions or errors in judgment, if the act, omission or error  in judgment is made in good
faith and within the scope  of the person’s duties, responsibilities or functions as a court
visitor.
Passed by Senate April 1, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 14, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1123 (SB 1123-A) Page 1